Oklahoma, session 2025, SB167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 683.37 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Department of Emergency Management shall


contract with an outside entity, pursuant to Section 85.1 et seq. of


Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to design and develop a statewide


Stormwater Management Predictive Analytic Solution. The Stormwater


Management Predictive Analytic Solution shall include early warning


detection and advanced flood monitoring systems. The Stormwater


Management Predictive Analytic Solution shall access and visualize

Req. No. 1372 Page 1


all relevant data; forecast future conditions; improve forecasting


models; provide real-time tracking and alerts; and improve


situational awareness, flood resiliency, and stormwater management


systems.


B. The Stormwater Management Predictive Analytic Solution shall


be operational no later than February 28, 2026. By August 1, 2026,


and annually thereafter, the Oklahoma Department of Emergency


Management shall submit an electronic report to the Governor,


Speaker of the House of Representatives, and President Pro Tempore


of the Senate summarizing the information from the Stormwater


Management Predictive Analytic Solution and subsequently analyzing


data from previous reporting years.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1372 RD 12/30/2024 12:29:06 PM



















Req. No. 1372 Page 2